Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB141.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 424.110 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 424.110 to 424.370:
(1) "Advertisement" means any matter required by law to be published;
(2) "Publication area" means the city, county, district, or other local area for which an
advertisement is required by law to be made. An advertisement shall be deemed to
be for a particular city, county, district, or other local area if it concerns an official
activity of the city, county, district, or other area or of any governing body, board,
commission, officer, agency, or court thereof, or if the subject of the advertisement
concerns particularly the people of the city, county, district, or other area;
(3)[(2)] "Published statement of ownership" means the current United States Postal
Service Form PS 3526, or successor form, filed by a print newspaper with the
United States Postal Service on or before October 1 of each year[ "Advertisement"
means any matter required by law to be published]; and
(4)[(3)] "Zoned edition" means a newspaper edition published at least once a week,
distributed in a specific geographic region of the newspaper's circulation area, and
containing reporting and advertising of interest to subscribers in that geographic
region.
Section 2. KRS 424.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (4) of this section, if an advertisement for
a publication area is required by law to be published in a newspaper, the publication
shall be made in a newspaper that meets the following requirements:
(a) It shall be published in the publication area. A newspaper shall be deemed to
be published in the area if it maintains an[its principal] office in the area for
the purpose of gathering news and soliciting advertisements and other general
business of newspaper publications, and has a periodicals class mailing permit
Page 1 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
issued for that office. A newspaper published outside of Kentucky shall not be
eligible to carry advertisements for any county or publication area within the
county, other than for the city in which its main office is located, if there is a
newspaper published in the county that has a substantial general circulation
throughout the county and that otherwise meets the requirements of this
section;
(b) It shall be of regular issue and have a bona fide circulation in the publication
area. A newspaper shall be deemed to be of regular issue if it is published at
least once a week, for at least fifty (50) weeks during the calendar year as
prescribed by its mailing permit, and has been so published in the area for the
immediately preceding two (2) year period. A newspaper meeting all the
criteria to be of regular issue, except publication in the area for the
immediately preceding two (2) year period, shall be deemed to be of regular
issue if it is the only qualified paper in the county. A newspaper shall be
deemed to be of bona fide circulation in the publication area if it is circulated
generally in the area, and maintains a definite price or consideration not less
than fifty percent (50%) of its published price, and is paid for by not less than
fifty percent (50%) of those to whom distribution is made;
(c) It shall bear a title or name, consist of not less than four (4) pages without a
cover, and be of a type to which the general public resorts for passing events
of a political, religious, commercial, and social nature, and for current
happenings, announcements, miscellaneous reading matter, advertisements,
and other notices. The news content shall be at least twenty-five percent
(25%) of the total column space in more than one-half (1/2) of its issues
during any twelve (12) month period;
(d) If, in a publication area there is more than one (1) newspaper which meets the
above requirements, the newspaper that produces and distributes a printed
Page 2 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
edition that is circulated within the publication area and is available for
paid public subscription or purchase shall be[having the largest bona fide
paid circulation as shown by the average number of paid copies of each issue
as shown in its published statement of ownership as filed on October 1 for the
publication area shall be] the newspaper where advertisements required by
law to be published shall be carried. If two (2) or more printed newspapers
serve the same publication area, the required advertisements shall be
published in the newspaper that has the highest total number of paid
subscribers, determined by adding:
1. The number of print product subscribers and single copy sales within
the publication area multiplied by two (2), as reported in the
newspaper's published statement of ownership; and
2. The total number of paid digital product subscribers who receive
content in the publication area, as reported in the newspaper's
published statement of ownership; and
(e) For the purposes of KRS Chapter 424, publishing shall be considered as the
total recurring processes of producing the newspaper, embracing all of the
included contents of reading matter, illustrations, and advertising enumerated
in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection. A newspaper shall not be excluded
from qualifying for the purposes of legal publications as provided in this
chapter if its printing or reproduction processes take place outside the
publication area.
(2) (a) If, in the case of a publication area smaller than the county in which it is
located, there is no newspaper published in the area, the publication shall be
made in a newspaper published in the county that is qualified under this
section to publish advertisements for the county. If the qualified newspaper
publishes a zoned edition which is distributed to regular subscribers within the
Page 3 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
publication area, any advertisement required by law to be published in the
publication area may be published in the zoned edition distributed in that area.
(b) 1. If, in any county there is no newspaper meeting the requirements of this
section for publishing advertisements for that county, any
advertisements required to be published for the county or for any
publication area within the county shall be published in a newspaper
qualified under subsection (1) of this section[of the largest bona fide
circulation] in that county published in and qualified to publish
advertisements for an adjoining similarly-sized county in Kentucky.
2. If there is no newspaper qualified to publish advertisements in an
adjoining similarly-sized county, the county and any government or
government agency required to make a publication may use the
alternative publication procedures provided in KRS 424.145 and
satisfy the requirements of KRS 424.145(4) by publishing the notice
advertisement in the newspaper with the greatest bona fide circulation
in the county, regardless of the location of the newspaper.
3. As used in this paragraph, "adjoining similarly-sized county" means a
county adjoining the county of publication that contains a population
of no greater than one hundred fifty percent (150%) and no less than
fifty percent (50%) of the population of the county of publication.
4. This subsection is intended to supersede any statute that provides or
contemplates that newspaper publication may be dispensed with if there
is no newspaper printed or published or of general circulation in the
particular publication area.
(c) Any newspaper responsible for publishing required advertising under this
subsection shall:
1. Publish the advertisement in accordance with Section 4 of this Act in
Page 4 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
the first print edition of the newspaper occurring after the receipt of
information from the government or government agency required to
publish the advertisement or within seven (7) days of receipt of the
advertisement, whichever occurs first;
2. Publish and display, at no additional cost to the government or
government agency, the advertisement as submitted by the government
or government agency on a website operated by or for the newspaper
within twenty-four (24) hours of its receipt, excluding Saturday,
Sunday, and any federally recognized holiday. The newspaper shall
provide written or email confirmation to the submitting government or
government agency of the date and time of posting;
3. Submit, within twenty-four (24) hours, excluding Saturday, Sunday,
and any federally recognized holiday, of receipt of information from
the government or government agency required to publish the
advertisement, the advertisement to a publicly accessible website
hosted and maintained by the Kentucky Press Association, or, in the
event of its dissolution or corporate reorganization, its successor or
competitor organization having the largest membership of newspapers
published in Kentucky and whose principal business office is located
in Kentucky, to be published on the website at no additional cost to the
government or government agency. The website shall provide a
repository of all such public notices from newspapers and shall be
easily searchable by criteria, including but not limited to topic and
location; and
4. As a condition precedent to remaining qualified under this section to
publish advertisements, promote the statewide website referenced
under subparagraph 3. of this paragraph at least four (4) times
Page 5 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
annually.
(d) Except as provided in KRS 424.145 or subsection (4) of this section, for
purposes of satisfying the time requirement for publication provided under
this chapter or any other provision of law, the effective publication date for
a public notice or public advertisement shall be the date it is first published
to the newspaper's website under subparagraph (c)2. of this subsection or
posted on the publicly accessible website pursuant to paragraph (c)3. of this
subsection, whichever occurs first.
(3) If a publication area consists of a district, other than a city, which extends into more
than one (1) county, the part of the district in each county shall be considered to be
a separate publication area for the purposes of this section, and an advertisement for
each separate publication area shall be published in a newspaper qualified under
this section to publish advertisements for the area.
(4) If an advertisement for a publication area is required by law to be published in a
newspaper, the publication may, alternatively, be made in a paid subscription
model digital newspaper that:
(a) Maintains an active news gathering office in the publication area;
(b) Has been actively publishing for at least one (1) year, and is updated on at
least a weekly basis;
(c) Has as its primary purpose reporting on matters of import to the public, and
contains regular reporting regarding local and community issues in the
publication area;
(d) Is easily accessible to the public through common Internet search engines or
other Internet search means;
(e) Contains conspicuous links or headings on its landing page that direct
members of the public to public notices;[ and]
(f) Qualifies to upload or submit its public notices to the public notice website
Page 6 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
hosted and maintained by the Kentucky Press Association, or, in the event
of its dissolution or corporate reorganization, its successor or competitor
organization having the largest membership of newspapers published in
Kentucky and whose principal business office is located in Kentucky; and
(g) Distributes, or has ownership interest in another entity that distributes,
newspapers printed in Kentucky, and is capable of circulating printed
newspapers throughout the publication area.
For purposes of satisfying publication requirements of this chapter, an
advertisement is deemed to be published on the date that it is posted on the website
of the digital newspaper, unless the advertisement is occurring under KRS
424.145. Any other statute requiring newspaper publication that contains
requirements related to the physical dimensions, typesetting, font, or other aspects
particular to a printed newspaper are not applicable where the advertisement is
made in a digital newspaper that qualifies under this subsection.
Section 3. KRS 424.147 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If a newspaper qualified under KRS 424.120 either makes an error or fails in time
or substance to make a publication in accordance with KRS 424.130 or 424.140
after receiving the information to be published, a city or county affected thereby
may, after it has notice of the error or failure and to avoid undue delay of
governmental process and procedure, remedy the error or failure by causing the
publication to occur on a notice website[Web site] as defined in KRS 424.145.
(2) Notwithstanding the time requirements imposed by KRS 424.130, a city or county
publishing to remedy an error or failure of a newspaper under subsection (1) of this
section shall immediately cause the publication of the matter on a notice
website[Web site], and this remedial website[Web site] publication shall be deemed
in full compliance with the requirements of this chapter or any other statute
prescribing the timing or manner of publication.
Page 7 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
Section 4. KRS 424.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For all newspaper advertising required by law, the publisher is entitled to receive
payment for each insertion at a rate per column inch. The advertisement shall be set
in no larger than seven (7) point type on solid leading. The rate shall not exceed the
lowest noncontract classified rate paid by advertisers or the lowest advertising rate
as provided by KRS 424.215, whichever is less. The terms and conditions of any
volume discounts given to commercial customers shall be extended to public
agencies of the Commonwealth of Kentucky. Any contractual terms offered to
other advertisers shall also be offered to the public agencies of the
Commonwealth. Newspapers shall give all local public agencies a written notice of
at least thirty (30) days of an advertising rate increase.
(2) If by law or by the nature of the matter to be published, a display form of
advertisement is required, or if the person or officer responsible for causing an
advertisement to be published determines in his discretion that a display form is
practicable or feasible, and so directs the newspaper, the advertisement shall be
published in display form[ and the newspaper shall be entitled to receive its
established display rate]. The rate charged by the newspaper shall be the lowest
advertising rate as provided in KRS 424.215 and shall be subject to any volume
discounts given to commercial customers.
(3) If it is provided by statute that an advertisement shall be published of the filing of a
petition or application seeking official action, the filing, if required by other than a
governmental official or agency, shall not be deemed complete unless there is
deposited with the petition or application an amount sufficient to pay the cost of
publication.
(4) The expense of advertisements in judicial proceedings shall be taxed as costs by the
clerk of the court.
Section 5. KRS 132.027 is amended to read as follows:
Page 8 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
(1) No city or urban-county government shall levy a tax rate which exceeds the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 until the city or urban-county
government has complied with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.
(2) (a) Cities or urban-county governments proposing to levy a tax rate which
exceeds the compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 shall hold a public
hearing to hear comments from the public regarding the proposed tax rate.
The hearing shall be held in the principal office of the taxing district, or, in the
event the taxing district has no office, or the office is not suitable for a
hearing, the hearing shall be held in a suitable facility as near as possible to
the geographic center of the district.
(b) The city or urban-county government shall advertise the hearing by causing to
be published at least twice in two (2) consecutive weeks, in a[the] newspaper
qualified under Section 2 of this Act[of largest circulation in the county],
an[a display type] advertisement of [not less than twelve (12) column inches,
]the following:
1. The tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue produced by
that rate;
2. The tax rate proposed for the current year and the revenue expected to
be produced by that rate;
3. The compensating tax rate and the revenue expected from it;
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearing which shall be held not less than
seven (7) days nor more than twenty-one (21)[ten (10)] days after the
day the second advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
Page 9 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained therein.
(c) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
property in the taxing district, addressed to the property owner at his residence
or principal place of business as shown on the current year property tax roll.
(d) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The taxing district may set
reasonable time limits for testimony.
(3) (a) That portion of a tax rate levied by an action of a city or urban-county
government which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive of
revenue from new property, more than four percent (4%) over the amount of
revenue produced by the compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 shall
be subject to a recall vote or reconsideration by the taxing district, as provided
for in KRS 132.017, and shall be advertised as provided for in paragraph (b)
of this subsection.
(b) The city or urban-county government shall, within seven (7) days following
adoption of an ordinance to levy a tax rate which will produce revenue from
real property, exclusive of revenue from new property as defined in KRS
132.010, more than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced
by the compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010, cause to be published,
in a[the] newspaper qualified under Section 2 of this Act[of largest
circulation in the county], an[a display type] advertisement of [not less than
twelve (12) column inches ]the following:
1. The fact that the city or urban-county government has adopted a rate;
2. The fact that the part of the rate which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property as defined in KRS 132.010, in
Page 10 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
excess of four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 is subject to recall, and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk of the
county or urban-county in which the taxing district is located, with a
notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate.
Section 6. KRS 68.245 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The property valuation administrator shall submit an official estimate of real and
personal property and new property assessment as defined in KRS 132.010, to the
county judge/executive by April 1 of each year.
(2) No county fiscal court shall levy a tax rate, excluding any special tax rate which
may be levied at the request of a county community improvement district pursuant
to KRS 107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote upon such tax by the
voters of that county, which exceeds the compensating tax rate defined in KRS
132.010, until the taxing district has complied with the provisions of subsection (5)
of this section.
(3) The state local finance officer shall certify to each county judge/executive, by June
30 of each year, the following:
(a) The compensating tax rate, as defined in KRS 132.010, and the amount of
revenue expected to be produced by it;
(b) The tax rate which will produce no more revenue from real property,
exclusive of revenue from new property, than four percent (4%) over the
amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate defined in KRS
132.010 and the amount of revenue expected to be produced by it.
(4) Real and personal property assessment and new property determined in accordance
with KRS 132.010 shall be certified to the state local finance officer by the
Department of Revenue upon completion of action on property assessment data.
Page 11 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
(5) (a) A county fiscal court, proposing to levy a tax rate, excluding any special tax
rate which may be levied at the request of a county community improvement
district pursuant to KRS 107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote
upon the tax by the voters of that county, which exceeds the compensating tax
rate defined in KRS 132.010, shall hold a public hearing to hear comments
from the public regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearing shall be held in
the principal office of the taxing district, or, in the event the taxing district has
no office, or the office is not suitable for a hearing, the hearing shall be held in
a suitable facility as near as possible to the geographic center of the district.
(b) County fiscal courts of counties containing a city of the first class proposing
to levy a tax rate, excluding any special tax rate which may be levied at the
request of a county community improvement district pursuant to KRS
107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote upon the tax by the voters of
that county, which exceeds the compensating tax rate defined in KRS
132.010, shall hold three (3) public hearings to hear comments from the
public regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearings shall be held in three (3)
separate locations; each location shall be determined by dividing the county
into three (3) approximately equal geographic areas, and identifying a suitable
facility as near as possible to the geographic center of each area.
(c) The county fiscal court shall advertise the hearing by causing to be published
at least twice in two (2) consecutive weeks, in a[the] newspaper qualified
under Section 2 of this Act[of largest circulation in the county], an[a display
type] advertisement of [not less than twelve (12) column inches, ]the
following:
1. The tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue produced by
that rate;
2. The tax rate proposed for the current year and the revenue expected to
Page 12 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
be produced by that rate;
3. The compensating tax rate and the revenue expected from it;
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearings which shall be held not less
than seven (7) days nor more than twenty one (21)[ten (10)] days, after
the day that the second advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained therein.
(d) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
property, addressed to the property owner at his residence or principal place
of business as shown on the current year property tax roll.
(e) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The county fiscal court may
set reasonable time limits for testimony.
(6) (a) That portion of a tax rate, excluding any special tax rate which may be levied
at the request of a county community improvement district pursuant to KRS
107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote upon a tax by the voters of
that county, levied by an action of a county fiscal court which will produce
revenue from real property, exclusive of revenue from new property, more
than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 shall be subject to a recall vote
or reconsideration by the taxing district, as provided for in KRS 132.017, and
shall be advertised as provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
Page 13 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
(b) The county fiscal court shall, within seven (7) days following adoption of an
ordinance to levy a tax rate, excluding any special tax rate which may be
levied at the request of a county community improvement district pursuant to
KRS 107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote upon a tax by the
voters of that county, which will produce revenue from real property,
exclusive of revenue from new property as defined in KRS 132.010, more
than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010, cause to be published, in
a[the] newspaper qualified under Section 2 of this Act[of largest circulation
in the county], an[a display type] advertisement of [not less than twelve (12)
column inches ]the following:
1. The fact that the county fiscal court has adopted a rate;
2. The fact that the part of the rate which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property as defined in KRS 132.010, in
excess of four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 is subject to recall; and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk, with a
notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate.
Section 7. KRS 132.023 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No special purpose governmental entity shall levy a tax rate which exceeds the
compensating tax rate until the taxing district has complied with the provisions of
KRS 65A.110 and subsection (2) of this section.
(2) (a) A special purpose governmental entity proposing to levy a tax rate which
exceeds the compensating tax rate shall submit the proposed rate as required
by KRS 65A.110 and shall hold a public hearing to hear comments from the
public regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearing shall be held in the same
Page 14 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
location where the governing body of the city or county where the largest
number of citizens served by the special purpose governmental entity reside
meets, and shall be held immediately before a regularly scheduled meeting of
that governing body.
(b) The special purpose governmental entity shall advertise the hearing by
causing to be published at least twice in two (2) consecutive weeks, in a[the]
newspaper qualified under Section 2 of this Act[of largest circulation in the
county], an[a display type] advertisement of [not less than twelve (12) column
inches, ]the following:
1. The tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue produced by
that rate;
2. The tax rate proposed for the current year and the revenue expected to
be produced by that rate;
3. The compensating tax rate and the revenue expected from it;
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearing which shall be held not less than
seven (7) days, nor more than twenty-one (21)[ten (10)] days, after the
day that the second advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained therein.
(c) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
property in the special purpose governmental entity, addressed to the property
owner at his residence or principal place of business as shown on the current
Page 15 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
year property tax roll.
(d) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The special purpose
governmental entity may set reasonable time limits for testimony.
(3) (a) That portion of a tax rate levied by an action of a special purpose
governmental entity which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive
of revenue from new property, more than four percent (4%) over the amount
of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate shall be subject to a recall
vote or reconsideration by the special purpose governmental entity, as
provided for in KRS 132.017, and shall be advertised as provided in
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The special purpose governmental entity shall, within seven (7) days
following adoption of an ordinance, order, resolution, or motion to levy a tax
rate which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive of revenue from
new property, more than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue
produced by the compensating tax rate, cause to be published, in a[the]
newspaper qualified under Section 2 of this Act[of largest circulation in the
county], an[a display type] advertisement of [not less than twelve (12) column
inches ]the following:
1. The fact that the taxing district has adopted a rate;
2. The fact that the part of the rate which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property, in excess of four percent (4%) over
the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate is subject
to recall; and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk of the
county in which the special purpose governmental entity is located, with
a notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
Page 16 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate.
Section 8. KRS 160.470 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, no district board of
education shall levy a general tax rate which will produce more revenue,
exclusive of revenue from net assessment growth as defined in KRS 132.010,
than would be produced by application of the general tax rate that could have
been levied in the preceding year to the preceding year's assessment, except as
provided in subsections (9) and (10) of this section and KRS 157.440.
(b) If an election is held as provided for in KRS 132.017 and the question should
fail, such failure shall not reduce the "...general tax rate that could have been
levied in the preceding year...," referred to in subsection (1)(a) of this section,
for purposes of computing the general tax rate for succeeding years.
In the event of a merger of school districts, the limitations contained in this section
shall be based upon the combined revenue of the merging districts, as computed
under the provisions of this section.
(2) No district board of education shall levy a general tax rate within the limits imposed
in subsection (1) of this section which respectively exceeds the compensating tax
rate defined in KRS 132.010, except as provided in subsections (9) and (10) of this
section, KRS 157.440, and KRS 157.621, until the district board of education has
complied with the provisions of subsection (7) of this section.
(3) Upon receipt of property assessments from the Department of Revenue, the
commissioner of education shall certify the following to each district board of
education:
(a) The general tax rate that a district board of education could levy under the
provisions of subsection (1) of this section, and the amount of revenue
expected to be produced;
(b) The compensating tax rate as defined in KRS 132.010 for a district's general
Page 17 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
tax rate the amount of revenue expected to be produced;
(c) The general tax rate which will produce, respectively, no more revenue from
real property, exclusive of revenue from new property, than four percent (4%)
over the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate defined in
KRS 132.010, and the amount of revenue expected to be produced.
(4) Upon completion of action on property assessment data, the Department of
Revenue shall submit certified property assessment data as required in KRS
133.125 to the chief state school officer.
(5) Within thirty (30) days after the district board of education has received its
assessment data, the rates levied shall be forwarded to the Kentucky Board of
Education for its approval or disapproval. The failure of the district board of
education to furnish the rates within the time prescribed shall not invalidate any
levy made thereafter.
(6) (a) Each district board of education shall, on or before January 31 of each
calendar year, formally and publicly examine detailed line item estimated
revenues and proposed expenditures for the subsequent fiscal year. On or
before May 30 of each calendar year, each district board of education shall
adopt a tentative working budget which shall include a minimum reserve of
two percent (2%) of the total budget.
(b) Each district board of education shall submit to the Kentucky Board of
Education no later than September 30, a close estimate or working budget
which shall conform to the administrative regulations prescribed by the
Kentucky Board of Education.
(7) (a) Except as provided in subsections (9) and (10) of this section and KRS
157.440, a district board of education proposing to levy a general tax rate
within the limits of subsection (1) of this section which exceed the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 shall hold a public hearing to
Page 18 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
hear comments from the public regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearing
shall be held in the principal office of the taxing district or, in the event the
taxing district has no office, or the office is not suitable for such a hearing, the
hearing shall be held in a suitable facility as near as possible to the geographic
center of the district.
(b) The district board of education shall advertise the hearing by causing the
following to be published at least twice for two (2) consecutive weeks, in
a[the] newspaper qualified under Section 2 of this Act[of largest circulation
in the county], an[a display type] advertisement of [not less than twelve (12)
column inches]:
1. The general tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue
produced by that rate;
2. The general tax rate for the current year, and the revenue expected to be
produced by that rate;
3. The compensating general tax rate, and the revenue expected from it;
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearing which shall be held not less than
seven (7) days nor more than twenty-one (21)[ten (10)] days after the
day that the second advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained herein.
(c) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
property, addressed to the property owner at his residence or principal place
Page 19 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
of business as shown on the current year property tax roll.
(d) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The district board of
education may set reasonable time limits for testimony.
(8) (a) That portion of a general tax rate, except as provided in subsections (9) and
(10) of this section, KRS 157.440, and KRS 157.621, levied by an action of a
district board of education which will produce, respectively, revenue from real
property, exclusive of revenue from new property, more than four percent
(4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate
defined in KRS 132.010, shall be subject to a recall vote or reconsideration by
the district board of education as provided for in KRS 132.017, and shall be
advertised as provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The district board of education shall, within seven (7) days following adoption
of an ordinance, order, resolution, or motion to levy a general tax rate, except
as provided in subsections (9) and (10) of this section and KRS 157.440,
which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive of revenue from
new property as defined in KRS 132.010, more than four percent (4%) over
the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate defined in KRS
132.010, cause the following to be published, in a[the] newspaper qualified
under Section 2 of this Act[of largest circulation in the county], an[a display
type] advertisement of [not less than twelve (12) column inches]:
1. The fact that the district board of education has adopted such a rate;
2. The fact that the part of the rate which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property as defined in KRS 132.010, in
excess of four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 is subject to recall; and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk of the
Page 20 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1938
county or urban-county in which the school district is located, with a
notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate.
(9) (a) Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, effective for school
years beginning after June 30, 1990, the board of education of each school
district shall levy a minimum equivalent tax rate of thirty cents ($0.30) for
general school purposes. Equivalent tax rate is defined as the rate which
results when the income collected during the prior year from all taxes levied
by the district for school purposes is divided by the total assessed value of
property plus the assessment for motor vehicles certified by the Department of
Revenue. School districts collecting school taxes authorized by KRS 160.593
to 160.597, 160.601 to 160.633, or 160.635 to 160.648 for less than twelve
(12) months during a school year shall have included in income collected
under this section the pro rata tax collection for twelve (12) months.
(b) Failure of a board to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection may
constitute a forfeiture of office by its members pursuant to KRS 415.050 and
415.060.
(10) A district board of education may levy a general tax rate that will produce revenue
from real property, exclusive of revenue from new property, that is four percent
(4%) over the amount of the revenue produced by the compensating tax rate as
defined in KRS 132.010.
Page 21 of 21
BR193800.100 - 1938 - XXXX 2/17/2026 4:57 PM Jacketed